Arkansas, session 2025, SB635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 3, Chapter 9, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
3-9-243. Bottle lockers in restaurants — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "bottle locker" means a storage system,
such as an individual locker or cabinet, within a restaurant where the
restaurant stores bottles of alcoholic beverages purchased and for
consumption by a guest for which the guest pays a storage fee to the
restaurant.
(b) A restaurant located in a wet territory that has been issued an
on-premises consumption permit to sell and serve alcoholic beverages may
offer to a guest of the restaurant the option of the use of a bottle locker
to store alcoholic beverages for later consumption at the restaurant by the
guest.



*CRH356*
04/09/2025 7:14:43 AM CRH356